Alaska statutes. Title 12. Code of Criminal Procedure.
Chapter 40. Grand Jury.

Cross references. —

For court rules on grand juries, see Rules 6 and 6.1, Alaska Rule of Criminal Procedure; for constitutional provisions, see
art. I, § 8 of the Alaska Constitution.

For provisions relating to a requirement of a grand jury before a general court martial, see AS

26.05.440

and

26.05.445

.

Sec. 12.40.010.
Qualifications and manner of drawing grand jurors.

Grand jurors shall have the qualifications and be drawn as are trial jurors under AS

09.20.010

—

09.20.080

.

History.

(§ 5.01 ch 34 SLA 1962)

Sec. 12.40.020.
Number of jurors.

The grand jury consists of not less than 12 nor more than 18 members.

History.

(§ 5.02 ch 34 SLA 1962)

Sec. 12.40.030.
Duty of inquiry into crimes and general powers.

The grand jury shall inquire into all crimes committed or triable within the jurisdiction of the court and present them to the court.
The grand jury shall have the power to investigate and make recommendations concerning the public welfare or safety.

History.

(§ 5.03 ch 34 SLA 1962)

Sec. 12.40.040.
Juror to disclose knowledge of crime.

If an individual grand juror knows or has reason to believe that a crime has been committed that is triable by the court, the juror shall disclose it to the other jurors, who shall investigate it.

History.

(§ 5.04 ch 34 SLA 1962)

Sec. 12.40.050.
Holding to answer as affecting indictment or presentment.

The grand jury may indict or present a person for a crime upon sufficient evidence, whether that person has been held to answer for the crime or not.

History.

(§ 5.05 ch 34 SLA 1962)

Sec. 12.40.060.
Access to public jails, prisons, and public records.

The grand jury is entitled to access, at all reasonable times, to the public jails and prisons, to offices pertaining to the courts of justice in the state, and to all other public offices, and to the examination of all public records in the state.

History.

(§ 5.06 ch 34 SLA 1962)

Sec. 12.40.070.
Duty of prosecuting attorney.

The prosecuting attorney

shall submit an indictment to the grand jury and cause the evidence in support of the indictment to be brought before them in every case when a person is held to answer a criminal charge in the court where the jury is formed;

may submit an indictment in any case when the prosecuting attorney has good reason to believe a crime has been committed that is triable by the court; and

shall, when required by the grand jury, prepare indictments or presentments for them and attend their sittings to advise them in relation to their duties or to examine witnesses in their presence.

History.

(§ 5.07 ch 34 SLA 1962)

Sec. 12.40.080.
Effect of failure to return indictment.

When a grand jury does not return an indictment, the charge is dismissed, and it may not be again submitted to or inquired into by the grand jury unless the court so orders.

History.

(§ 5.08 ch 34 SLA 1962)

Sec. 12.40.090.
Questioning juror for conduct.

A grand juror cannot be questioned for anything the juror may say or any vote the juror may give while acting as a grand juror, in relation to any matter legally pending before the grand jury, except for a perjury of which the juror may have been guilty in giving testimony before that jury.

History.

(§ 5.09 ch 34 SLA 1962)

Sec. 12.40.100.
Contents of indictment.

The indictment must be direct and certain as it regards

the party charged;

the crime charged; and

the particular circumstances of the crime charged when they are necessary to constitute a complete crime.

The statement of the facts constituting the offense must be in ordinary and concise language, without repetition, and in a manner that will enable a person of common understanding to know what is intended.

An indictment that complies with this section and with applicable rules adopted by the supreme court is valid and need not specify aggravating factors set out in AS

12.55.155

.

History.

(§ 5.10 ch 34 SLA 1962; am § 2 ch 2 SLA 2005)

Cross references. —

For similar court rule, see Rule 7(c), Alaska Rule of Criminal Procedure.

For a statement of legislative intent relating to (c) of this section, see § 1, ch. 2, SLA 2005, in the 2005 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2005 amendment, effective March 23, 2005, added subsection (c).

Editor’s notes. —

Section 33, ch. 2, SLA 2005, provides that (c) of this section applies “to offenses committed before, on, or after March 23, 2005.”
See § 33, ch. 2, SLA 2005, in the 2005 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 12.40.110.
Hearsay evidence in prosecutions for sexual offenses.

In a prosecution for an offense under AS

11.41.410

—

11.41.458

, hearsay evidence of a statement related to the offense, not otherwise admissible, made by a child who is the victim of the offense may be admitted into evidence before the grand jury if

the circumstances of the statement indicate its reliability;

the child is under 10 years of age when the hearsay evidence is sought to be admitted;

additional evidence is introduced to corroborate the statement; and

the child testifies at the grand jury proceeding or the child will be available to testify at trial.

In this section “statement” means an oral or written assertion or nonverbal conduct if the nonverbal conduct is intended as an assertion.

History.

(§ 1 ch 41 SLA 1985; am § 12 ch 81 SLA 1998)